Mississippi statutes. Title 35. War Veterans and Pensions
In General

§ 35-1-1.
Creation of State Veterans Affairs Board; composition; qualifications, appointment and terms of office of members; officers; meetings.

There is hereby created a State Veterans Affairs Board, which may also be referred to as the “Mississippi Veterans Affairs,” to consist of seven (7) members, to be appointed by the Governor, one (1) from each congressional district as they existed on January 1, 1952, of the State of Mississippi. One (1) shall be appointed for one (1) year, another for two (2) years, another for three (3) years, another for four (4) years, another for five (5) years, another for six (6) years, and another for seven (7) years, thus staggered. At the end of such term for each of said seven (7) members, a successor shall be appointed for a term of seven (7) years, thus providing for seven (7) members, one (1) of whom shall be appointed each year. In the event of death, resignation or removal of a member of the board, such person appointed to fill the vacancy shall be a legal resident of the congressional district in which the vacancy shall occur, and shall serve for the remainder of the term to which such member was appointed. Members of the board shall be veterans of any war or police action in which the Armed Forces of the United States have been, are, or shall be committed for action, who have been honorably discharged or honorably released.

From and after May 14, 1992, terms of all members then serving on the State Veterans Affairs Board shall terminate, and the board shall be reconstituted as follows: The board shall consist of seven (7) members. All members shall be appointed by the Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate. One (1) member shall be appointed from each congressional district as such districts existed on March 1, 1992, and two (2) members shall be appointed from the state at large. Of the initial congressional district appointees to the board, one (1) shall serve for a term of one (1) year, one (1) for a term of two (2) years, one (1) for a term of three (3) years, one (1) for a term of four (4) years and one (1) for a term of five (5) years. Of the initial at-large appointees, one (1) (who shall be that person appointed in January 1992 from the First Congressional District under the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection) shall serve for a term of three (3) years and one (1) (who shall be that person appointed in January 1992 from the Seventh Congressional District under the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection) shall serve for a term of five (5) years. All appointees after the initial appointees shall serve for terms of five (5) years each. In the event of death, resignation or removal of a member of the board, the vacancy shall be filled by appointment of the Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate, from the congressional district in which the vacancy occurs, for the length of the unexpired term only. Members of the board shall be honorably discharged or released veterans of any war or police action in which the Armed Forces of the United States have been, are, or shall be committed for action. No state/department commander of any federally recognized veterans organization, no national officer of any federally recognized veterans organization and no member of the Mississippi Council of Veterans Organizations shall be eligible for appointment to the board until the expiration of a period of three (3) years after the termination of their service in such disqualifying positions.

Members of the board shall annually elect as chairman one of their number and another member as vice chairman. Members of the board shall hold regular monthly meetings and such other meetings as may be called by the chairman or the vice chairman in his absence.

Beginning July 1, 2019, any reference in this code to the State Veterans Affairs Board shall also mean the Mississippi Veterans Affairs.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7486-01; Laws, 1948, ch. 504, § 1; Laws, 1952, ch. 314, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 535, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 14, 1992); Laws, 2019, ch. 397, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 35-1-3.
Appointment of executive director, deputy director, managers of major functional areas, and managers of state veterans homes.

The State Veterans Affairs Board shall appoint, to serve at the will and pleasure of the board, an executive director, (who shall also serve as Executive Secretary of the State Veterans Affairs Board), a deputy director, individuals to manage each of the agency’s major functional areas and individuals to manage each of the state veterans homes. The executive director and deputy director shall be a currently serving member or honorably discharged or honorably released veteran of any active or reserve component branch of the Armed Forces of the United States. The board may establish additional minimum qualifications for agency positions.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, §§ 7328, 7329; 1942, § 7486-02; Laws, 1926, ch. 339; Laws, 1942, ch. 322; Laws, 1948, ch. 504, § 2; Laws, 1952, ch. 314, § 2; Laws, 1960, ch. 401; Laws, 1994, ch. 425, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 612, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 476, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 522, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2001; Laws, 2018, ch. 364, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 16, 2018).

§ 35-1-5.
Compensation of members of board and staff.

The members of the State Veterans Affairs Board shall receive no salary but shall be entitled to a per diem allowance in the amount provided in Section 25-3-69 while in attendance at any regular or called meeting of the board or while in the performance of other official duties in connection with the work of the board as authorized or directed by the board. The members of the board shall receive, in addition thereto, actual and necessary expenses as provided by law in the performance of such duties.

The compensation of all employees of the board, including the executive director, deputy director and division directors, shall be paid from such monies as the Legislature shall from time to time appropriate.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, §§ 7328, 7329, 7331; 1942, §§ 7486-01, 7486-02, 7486-05; Laws, 1926, ch. 339; Laws, 1930, ch. 93; Laws, 1942, ch. 322; Laws, 1948, ch. 504, §§ 1, 2, 5; Laws, 1952, ch. 314, §§ 1, 2, 5; Laws, 1956, ch. 350; Laws, 1958, ch. 342; Laws, 1960, chs. 282, 401; Laws, 1966, ch. 445, § 22; Laws, 1975, ch. 389; Laws, 1985, ch. 420; Laws, 1994, ch. 425, § 2; Laws, 1995, ch. 612, § 2; Laws, 1999, ch. 476, § 2.

§ 35-1-7.
General duties and powers of board.

The duties of the State Veterans Affairs Board shall be to assist former and present members of the Armed Forces of the United States, and their dependents, in securing any benefits or privileges under any federal or state law or regulation to which they are entitled and to advise the Governor and Legislature on veterans affairs. Moreover, veterans or their dependents shall be given their choice of organizations to represent them in instances where a case is appealed, and the board shall lend its full cooperation in connection therewith.

The board and its employees shall cooperate fully with all congressionally chartered veterans organizations within the state, including servicing the power of attorney of the congressionally chartered veterans organizations upon the request of the organizations to the State Veterans Affairs Board in the prosecution of all claims on behalf of veterans. However, all powers of attorney to the State Veterans Affairs Board shall be processed first, and thereafter, powers of attorney shall be processed for veterans organizations in the ratio that the membership of the organization bears to the total number of veterans residing in Mississippi.

The State Veterans Affairs Board is designated as the “state approving agency” for the State of Mississippi. It shall be the duty of the State Veterans Affairs Board to inspect, approve and supervise schools, institutions and establishments for war orphan and veteran training as provided in Section 1771, Chapter 35, Title 38, United States Code, and in any subsequent acts passed by the Congress of the United States for the purpose of education and training of war orphans or former and present members of the Armed Forces of the United States. The State Veterans Affairs Board is authorized to employ the needed personnel to perform the duties as outlined in Section 1771, Chapter 35, Title 38, United States Code, and in any subsequent acts as enacted by the Congress of the United States, and to enter into contract with the Department of Veterans Affairs for salary and travel reimbursement for personnel employed for this purpose.

The State Veterans Affairs Board shall operate all Mississippi state veterans homes when established as authorized by Sections 35-1-19 through 35-1-29.

The State Veterans Affairs Board is authorized to adopt such policies and to prescribe such rules and regulations as it may deem necessary for the proper administration of this chapter. However, such policies and regulations shall not be in conflict with any of the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 7330; 1942, § 7486-03; Laws, 1926, ch. 339; Laws, 1942, ch. 322; Laws, 1948, ch. 504, § 3; Laws, 1952, ch. 314, § 3; Laws, 1966, ch. 534, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 466, § 7; Laws, 1993, ch. 426, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 425, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 16, 1994).

§ 35-1-9.
Cooperation by county welfare departments.

In addition to all other duties now or hereafter imposed by law, it shall be the duty of the county departments of public welfare, to cooperate with the state veterans affairs board, and to aid all residents of the State of Mississippi who served in the military or naval forces of the United States during any war or police action in which the armed forces of the United States have been, are, or shall be committed for action, their relatives, beneficiaries or dependents, in receiving from the United States any and all compensations, hospitalization, insurance, other aid or benefits to which they may be entitled under existing or hereafter enacted laws of the United States.

This section shall not be held to repeal any existing law relative to the duties of such county departments, but shall be supplemental and cumulative thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7486-09; Laws, 1944, ch. 294; Laws, 1948, ch. 504, § 9; Laws, 1952, ch. 314, § 6.

§ 35-1-11.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1980, ch. 338, eff from and after July 1, 1980.

[Codes, 1942, § 7486-04; Laws, 1948, ch. 504, § 4; Laws, 1952, ch. 314, § 4]

§ 35-1-13.
Seal of board.

The executive director appointed by the State Veterans Affairs Board shall have a seal which shall be in the form of a circle with the image of an eagle in the center and around the margin the words: “State Veterans Affairs Board State of Mississippi,” and under the image of the eagle the word: “Official.”

The executive director, deputy director, division directors and state veterans service officers shall affix the seal prescribed by this section to every document where the same is required by law, and to every certificate and other official paper executed by them where necessary or proper. All documents authenticated with the seal and signed by the executive director, deputy director, a division director or a state veteran service officer shall be recognized as properly attested to in the same manner as if authenticated by notaries public, summary court officials and others authorized by law to take acknowledgments. All copies of papers, copied or certified to by the executive director, deputy director, a division director or a state veterans service officer and authenticated by the seal, shall be accepted in all matters equally in like manner as the original.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 7338; 1942, § 7486-07; Laws, 1930, ch. 6; Laws, 1934, ch. 167; Laws, 1948, ch. 504, § 7; Laws, 1994, ch. 425, § 4; Laws, 1995, ch. 612, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 7, 1995).

§ 35-1-15.
Notarial powers of employees.

The executive director appointed by the State Veterans Affairs Board, the deputy director, division director and state veterans service officers shall have power to administer oaths and affirmations and to take acknowledgments anywhere within the State of Mississippi under the board’s seal of office and to perform all other duties required of notaries public.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 7334; 1942, § 7486-08; Laws, 1930, ch. 6; Laws, 1934, ch. 167; Laws, 1948, ch. 504, § 8; Laws, 1994, ch. 425, § 5; Laws, 1995, ch. 612, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 7, 1995).

§ 35-1-17.
Office.

The Department of Finance and Administration shall furnish suitable office space for the board and its employees.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 7332; 1942, § 7486-06; Laws, 1926, ch. 339; Laws, 1948, ch. 504, § 6; Laws, 1994, ch. 425, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved March 16, 1994).